src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V28_odd

+V+Inf:%>ньщуӈкве K ;

+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1:%>ньще̄гум K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2:%>ньще̄гын K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3:%>ньщи K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1:%>ньщиме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2:%>ньщегы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3:%>ньще̄г K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:%>ньще̄в K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:%>ньщегы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3:%>ньще̄гыт K ;

+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>ньщилум K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>ньщилын K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>ньщитэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>ньщиламе̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>ньщилы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>ньщитэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>ньщилув K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>ньщилы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>ньщия̄ныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>ньщиягум K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>ньщиягын K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>ньщияге K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>ньщиягме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>ньщиягы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>ньщияге̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>ньщиягув K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>ньщиягы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>ньщияга̄ныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>ньщиянум K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>ньщиян K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>ньщиянэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>ньщиянме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>ньщияны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>ньщиянэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>ньщиянув K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>ньщияны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>ньщия̄ныл K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>ньщияна̄ныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1:%>щсум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2:%>щсын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3:%>ньщис K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1:%>щсаме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2:%>щсы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3:%>щсы̄г K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1:%>щсӯв K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2:%>щсы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3:%>щсыт K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>ньщислум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>ньщислын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>ньщистэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>ньщисламе̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>ньщислы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>ньщистэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>ньщислув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>ньщислы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>щса̄ныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>щсагум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>щсагын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>щсаге K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>щсагме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>щсагы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>щсаге̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>щсагув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>щсагы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>щса̄ныл K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>щсаганыл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>щсанум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>щсан K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>щсанэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>щсанме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>щсаны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>щсанэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>щсанув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>щсаны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>щсаныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1:%>ньщанӯвум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2:%>ньщанӯвын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3:%>ньщанув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1:%>ньщануваме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2:%>ньщанувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3:%>ньщанувы̄г K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1:%>ньщанувӯв K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2:%>ньщанувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3:%>ньщанӯвыт K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>ньщанӯвлум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>ньщанӯвлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>ньщанӯвтэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>ньщанувламе̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>ньщанувлы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>ньщанувтэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>ньщанувлув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>ньщанувлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>ньщанува̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>ньщанува̄гум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>ньщанува̄гын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>ньщанува̄ге K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>ньщанувагме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>ньщанувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>ньщануваге̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>ньщанувагув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>ньщанувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>ньщанувага̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>ньщанува̄нум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>ньщанува̄нын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>ньщанува̄нэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>ньщануванме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>ньщануваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>ньщануванэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>ньщануванув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>ньщануваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>ньщанува̄ныл K ;

+V+Imp+ScSg2:%>ньщен K ;
+V+Imp+ScDu2:%>ньще̄н K ;
+V+Imp+ScPl2:%>ньще̄н K ;

+V+Imp+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>ньщелн K ;
+V+Imp+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>ньщелн K ;
+V+Imp+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>ньщелн K ;

+V+Imp+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>ньщегын K ;
+V+Imp+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>ньщегын K ;
+V+Imp+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>ньщегын K ;

+V+Imp+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>ньще̄н K ;
+V+Imp+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>ньще̄н K ;
+V+Imp+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>ньще̄н K ;

+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg1:%>ньщавем K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg2:%>ньщавен K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg3:%>ньщаве K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu1:%>ньщавемена K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu1:%>ньщавеме̄н K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu2:%>ньщавена K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu2:%>ньщаве̄н K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu3:%>ньщавега K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu3:%>ньщаве̄г K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl1:%>ньщавева K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl1:%>ньщаве̄в K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl2:%>ньщавена K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl2:%>ньщаве̄н K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl3:%>ньщавет K ;

+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg1:%>ньщаве̄сум K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg2:%>ньщавесын K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg3:%>ньщавес K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu1:%>ньщавесме̄н K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu2:%>ньщавесы̄н K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu3:%>ньщавесы̄г K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl1:%>ньщавесӯв K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl2:%>ньщавесы̄н K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl3:%>ньщаве̄сыт K ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!LEXICON V28_even
!
!+V+Inf:%>ньщаӈкве K ;
!
!+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1:%>ньще̄гум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2:%>ньще̄гын K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3:%>ньщи K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1:%>ньщиме̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2:%>ньщегы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3:%>ньще̄г K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:%>ньще̄в K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:%>ньщегы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3:%>ньще̄гыт K ;
!
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>ньщилум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>ньщилын K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>ньщитэ K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>ньщиламе̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>ньщилы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>ньщитэ̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>ньщилув K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>ньщилы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>ньщия̄ныл K ;
!
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>ньщиягум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>ньщиягын K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>ньщияге K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>ньщиягме̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>ньщиягы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>ньщияге̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>ньщиягув K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>ньщиягы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>ньщияга̄ныл K ;
!
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>ньщиянум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>ньщиян K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>ньщиянэ K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>ньщиянме̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>ньщияны̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>ньщиянэ̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>ньщиянув K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>ньщияны̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>ньщия̄ныл K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>ньщияна̄ныл K ;
!
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1:%>щсум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2:%>щсын K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3:%>ньщис K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1:%>щсаме̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2:%>щсы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3:%>щсы̄г K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1:%>щсӯв K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2:%>щсы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3:%>щсыт K ;
!
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>ньщислум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>ньщислын K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>ньщистэ K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>ньщисламе̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>ньщислы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>ньщистэ̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>ньщислув K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>ньщислы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>щса̄ныл K ;
!
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>щсагум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>щсагын K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>щсаге K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>щсагме̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>щсагы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>щсаге̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>щсагув K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>щсагы̄н K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>щса̄ныл K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>щсаганыл K ;
!
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>щсанум K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>щсан K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>щсанэ K ;
!+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>щсанме̄н K ;
