src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
лю̄ньщуӈкве:лю̄ V28_odd "плакать" ;
люньщуӈкве:лю V28_odd "плакать" ;
о̄ньщуӈкве:о̄ V28_odd "иметь//владеть" ;
тув-ка̄ньщуӈкве:тув-ка̄ V28_odd "ссохнуться" ;
ханьщуӈкве:ха V28_odd "угадать" ;
